North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§§ 130A-309.120 through 130A-309.125.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-209, s. 19(a), effective September 1, 2017.

History.
2009-163, s. 1; repealed by 2017-209, s. 19(a), effective September 1, 2017. G.S. 130A-309.121; 2009-163, s. 1; 2010-31, s. 13.10(a); repealed by 2017-209, s. 19(a), effective September 1, 2017. G.S. 130A-309.122; 2009-163,
s. 1; repealed by 2017-209, s. 19(a), effective September 1, 2017. G.S. 130A-309.123; 2009-163, s. 1; 2010-31, s. 13.10(b); 2010-123, s. 5.2(a); repealed by 2017-209, s. 19(a), effective September 1, 2017. G.S. 130A-309.124; 2009-163,
s. 1; repealed by 2017-209, s. 19(a), effective September 1, 2017. G.S. 130A-309.125; 2009-163, s. 1; repealed by 2017-209, s. 19(a), effective September 1, 2017.

Cross References.

As to administrative penalties for violations of this Part, see

G.S. 130A-22

.

Temporary Suspension of Operation of Part 2G of Article 9 of Chapter 130A.

Session Laws 2011-47, s. 1, provides: “The operation of Part 2G of Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes (Plastic Bag Management) is suspended until the earlier of June 30, 2011, or the issuance of an executive order by the Governor that the
supply chain for paper bags in counties subject to Part 2G has been restored.”

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 13.10(d), expiring May, 1, 2011, provides: “Any retailer with less than 5,000 square feet of retail space that is not part of a retail chain may provide customers with plastic bags that do not comply with Part 2G of Article 9
of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes, provided that the bags were purchased or contracted for purchase prior to May 1, 2010. For purposes of this subsection, ‘retail chain’ means five or more stores located within the State that
are engaged in the same general field of business and (i) conduct business under the same business name or (ii) operate under common ownership or management or pursuant to a franchise agreement with the same franchisor.”

§ 130A-309.130.
Findings.

The General Assembly makes the following findings:

The computer equipment and television waste stream is growing rapidly in volume and complexity and can introduce toxic materials into solid waste landfills.

It is in the best interest of the citizens of this State to have convenient, simple, and free access to recycling services for discarded computer equipment and televisions.

Collection programs operated by manufacturers and local government and nonprofit agencies are an efficient way to divert discarded computer equipment and televisions from disposal and to provide recycling services to all citizens of this State.

The development of local and nonprofit collection programs is hindered by the high costs of recycling and transporting discarded computer equipment and televisions.

No comprehensive system currently exists, provided either by electronics manufacturers, retailers, or others, to adequately serve all citizens of the State and to divert large quantities of discarded computer equipment and televisions from disposal.

Manufacturer responsibility is an effective way to ensure that manufacturers of computer equipment and televisions take part in a solution to the electronic waste problem.

The recycling of certain discarded computer equipment and televisions recovers valuable materials for reuse and will create jobs and expand the tax base of the State.

While some computers and computer monitors can be refurbished and reused and other consumer electronics products contain valuable materials, some older and bulkier consumer electronic products, including some televisions, may not contain any valuable
products but should nevertheless be recycled to prevent the release of toxic substances to the environment.

For the products covered by this Part, differences in product life expectancy, market economics, residual value, and product portability necessitate different approaches to recycling.

In order to ensure that end-of-life computer equipment and televisions are responsibly recycled, to promote conservation, and to protect public health and the environment, a comprehensive and convenient system for recycling and reuse of certain electronic
equipment should be established on the basis of shared responsibility among manufacturers, retailers, consumers, and the State.

History.
2010-67, s. 2(a).

§ 130A-309.131.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, the following definitions apply:

Business entity. — Defined in G.S. 55-1-40(2a).

(1a)
Computer. — An electronic, magnetic, optical, electrochemical, or other high-speed data processing device that has all of the following features:

Performs logical, arithmetic, and storage functions for general purpose needs that are met through interaction with a number of software programs contained in the computer.

Is not designed to exclusively perform a specific type of limited or specialized application.

Achieves human interface through a keyboard, display unit, and mouse or other pointing device.

Is designed for a single user.

Computer equipment. — Any computer, monitor or video display unit for a computer system, and the peripheral equipment except keyboards and mice, and a printing device such as a printer, a scanner, a combination print-scanner-fax machine, or other device
designed to produce hard paper copies from a computer. Computer equipment does not include an automated typewriter, professional workstation, server, ICI device, ICI system, mobile telephone, portable handheld calculator, portable
digital assistant (PDA), MP3 player, or other similar device; an automobile; a television; a household appliance; a large piece of commercial or industrial equipment, such as commercial medical equipment, that contains a cathode
ray tube, a cathode ray tube device, a flat panel display, or similar video display device that is contained within, and is not separate from, the larger piece of equipment, or other medical devices as that term is defined under
the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

Computer equipment manufacturer. — A person that manufactures or has manufactured computer equipment sold under its own brand or label; sells or has sold under its own brand or label computer equipment produced by other suppliers; imports or has imported
into the United States computer equipment that was manufactured outside of the United States; or owns or has owned a brand that it licenses or has licensed to another person for use on computer equipment. Computer equipment manufacturer
includes a business entity that acquires another business entity that manufactures or has manufactured computer equipment. Computer equipment manufacturer does not include any existing person that does not and has not manufactured
computer equipment of the type that would be used by consumers.

Consumer. — Any of the following:

An occupant of a single detached dwelling unit or a single unit contained within a multiple dwelling unit who used a covered device primarily for personal or home business use.

A nonprofit organization with fewer than 10 employees that used a covered device in its operations.

Covered device. — Computer equipment and televisions used by consumers primarily for personal or home business use. The term does not include a device that is any of the following:

Part of a motor vehicle or any component of a motor vehicle assembled by, or for, a vehicle manufacturer or franchised dealer, including replacement parts for use in a motor vehicle.

Physically a part of or integrated within a larger piece of equipment designed and intended for use in an industrial, governmental, commercial, research and development, or medical setting.

Equipment used for diagnostic, monitoring, or other medical products as that term is defined under the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

Equipment used for security, sensing, monitoring, antiterrorism purposes, or emergency services purposes.

Contained within a household appliance, including, but not limited to, a clothes washer, clothes dryer, refrigerator, refrigerator and freezer, microwave oven, conventional oven or range, dishwasher, room air conditioner, dehumidifier, air purifier, or
exercise equipment.

Recodified to subdivision (1a).

Discarded computer equipment. — Computer equipment that is solid waste generated by a consumer.

Discarded computer equipment or television collector. — A municipal or county government, nonprofit agency, recycler, or retailer that knowingly accepts for recycling discarded computer equipment or a television from a consumer.

Discarded television. — A television that is solid waste generated by a consumer.

(9a)
Electronic device. — Machinery that is powered by a battery or an electrical cord.

Market share. — A television manufacturer’s obligation to recycle discarded televisions. A television manufacturer’s market share is the television manufacturer’s prior year’s sales of televisions as calculated by the Department pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.138(4)
divided by all manufacturers’ prior year’s sales for all televisions as calculated by the Department pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.138(4). Market share may be expressed as a percentage, a fraction, or a decimal fraction.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-1, s. 2(d), effective March 16, 2015.

Recover. — The process of reusing or recycling covered devices.

Recycle. — The processing, including disassembling, dismantling, and shredding, of covered devices or their components to recover a usable product. Recycle does not include any process that results in the incineration of a covered device.

Recycler. — A person that recycles covered devices.

Retailer. — A person that sells computer equipment or televisions in the State to a consumer. Retailer includes a computer equipment manufacturer or a television manufacturer that sells directly to a consumer through any means, including transactions
conducted through sales outlets, catalogs, the Internet, or any similar electronic means, but does not include a person that sells computer equipment or televisions to a distributor or retailer through a wholesale transaction.

Television. — Any electronic device that contains a tuner that locks on to a selected carrier frequency and is capable of receiving and displaying of television or video programming via broadcast, cable, or satellite, including, without limitation, any
direct view or projection television with a viewable screen of nine inches or larger whose display technology is based on cathode ray tube (CRT), plasma, liquid crystal display (LCD), digital light processing (DLP), liquid crystal
on silicon (LCOS), silicon crystal reflective display (SXRD), light emitting diode (LED), or similar technology marketed and intended for use by a consumer primarily for personal purposes. The term does not include computer equipment.

Television manufacturer. — A person that: (i) manufactures for sale in this State a television under a brand that it licenses or owns; (ii) manufactures for sale in this State a television without affixing a brand; (iii) resells into this State a television
under a brand it owns or licenses produced by other suppliers, including retail establishments that sell a television under a brand that the retailer owns or licenses; (iv) imports into the United States or exports from the United
States a television for sale in this State; (v) sells at retail a television acquired from an importer that is the manufacturer as described in sub-subdivision (iv) of this subdivision, and the retailer elects to register in lieu
of the importer as the manufacturer of those products; (vi) manufactures a television for or supplies a television to any person within a distribution network that includes wholesalers or retailers in this State and that benefits
from the sale in this State of the television through the distribution network; or (vii) assumes the responsibilities and obligations of a television manufacturer under this Part. In the event the television manufacturer is one
that manufactures, sells, or resells under a brand it licenses, the licensor or brand owner of the brand shall not be considered to be a television manufacturer under (i) or (iii) of this subdivision.

History.
2010-67, s. 2(a); 2010-180, s. 20; 2015-1, s. 2(d).

§ 130A-309.132.
Responsibility for recycling discarded computer equipment and televisions.

In addition to the specific requirements of this Part, discarded computer equipment and television collectors and computer equipment manufacturers and television manufacturers share responsibility for the recycling of discarded computer equipment and
televisions and the education of citizens of the State as to recycling opportunities for discarded computer equipment and televisions.

History.
2010-67, s. 2(a).

§ 130A-309.133.
Data security.

Computer equipment manufacturers, television manufacturers, discarded computer equipment and television collectors, recyclers, and retailers shall not be liable in any way for data or other information left on a covered device that is collected or recovered
pursuant to the provisions of this Part.

History.
2010-67, s. 2(a).

§ 130A-309.134.
Requirements for computer equipment manufacturers.

Registration Required. — Each computer equipment manufacturer, before selling or offering for sale computer equipment in North Carolina, shall register with the Department.

Manufacturer Label Required. — A computer equipment manufacturer shall not sell or offer to sell computer equipment in this State unless a visible, permanent label clearly identifying the manufacturer of that equipment is affixed to the equipment.

Computer Equipment Recycling Plan Required. — Each computer equipment manufacturer shall develop, submit to the Department, and implement one of the following plans to provide a free and reasonably convenient recycling program to take responsibility
for computer equipment discarded by consumers:

Level I recycling plan. — A computer equipment manufacturer shall submit a recycling plan for reuse or recycling of computer equipment discarded by consumers in the State produced by the manufacturer. The manufacturer shall submit a proposed plan to
the Department within 90 days of registration as required by subsection (a) of this section. The plan shall:

Provide that the manufacturer will take responsibility for computer equipment discarded by consumers that it manufactured.

Describe any direct take-back program to be implemented by the manufacturer. Collection methods that are deemed to meet the requirements of this subdivision include one or more of the following:

A process offered by the computer equipment manufacturer or the manufacturer’s designee for consumers to return discarded computer equipment by mail.

A physical collection site operated and maintained by the computer equipment manufacturer or the manufacturer’s designee to receive discarded computer equipment from consumers, which is available to consumers during normal business hours.

A collection event hosted by the computer equipment manufacturer or the manufacturer’s designee at which a consumer may return computer equipment.

Include a detailed description as to how the manufacturer will implement the plan.

Provide for environmentally sound management practices to transport and recycle discarded computer equipment.

Include a consumer recycling education program on the laws governing the recycling and reuse of discarded computer equipment under this Part and on the methods available to consumers to comply with those requirements. The manufacturer shall operate a
toll-free telephone number to answer questions from consumers about computer recycling options.

Level II recycling plan. — A computer equipment manufacturer shall submit a recycling plan for reuse or recycling of computer equipment discarded by consumers in the State produced by the manufacturer and by other manufacturers. The manufacturer shall
submit a proposed plan to the Department within 90 days of registration as required by subsection (a) of this section. The plan may offer additional options to collect other types of electronic equipment that do not constitute
discarded computer equipment, as that term is defined under

G.S. 130A-309.131

, and may allow for assessment of a nominal fee for collection of these other types of electronic equipment that are not discarded computer equipment. The plan shall include all of the elements set forth
in subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section. In addition the plan shall:

Provide that the manufacturer will take responsibility for computer equipment discarded by consumers that was manufactured by other manufacturers, as well as computer equipment that it manufactured.

Provide that the manufacturer shall: (i) maintain physical collection sites to receive discarded computer equipment from consumers in the 10 most populated municipalities in the State. The physical collection sites shall be available to consumers during
normal business hours, at a minimum; and (ii) host at least two collection events annually within the State.

Level III recycling plan. — A computer equipment manufacturer shall submit a recycling plan for reuse or recycling of computer equipment discarded by consumers in the State produced by the manufacturer and by other manufacturers. The manufacturer shall
submit a proposed plan to the Department within 90 days of registration as required by subsection (a) of this section. The plan may offer additional options to collect other types of electronic equipment that do not constitute
discarded computer equipment, as that term is defined under

G.S. 130A-309.131

, and may allow for assessment of a nominal fee for collection of these other types of electronic equipment that are not discarded computer equipment. The plan shall include all of the elements set forth
in subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section. In addition the plan shall:

Provide that the manufacturer will take responsibility for computer equipment discarded by consumers that was manufactured by other manufacturers, as well as computer equipment that it manufactured.

Provide that the manufacturer shall: (i) maintain physical collection sites to receive discarded computer equipment from consumers in 50 of the State’s counties, of which 10 of those counties shall be the most populated counties in the State. The physical
collection sites shall be available to consumers during normal business hours, at a minimum; and (ii) host at least two collection events annually within the State.

Fee Required. — Within 90 days of registration as required in subsection (a) of this section, a computer equipment manufacturer shall pay an initial registration fee to the Department. A computer equipment manufacturer that has registered shall pay an
annual renewal registration fee to the Department, which shall be paid each year no later than July 1. The proceeds of these fees shall be credited to the Electronics Management Fund established pursuant to

G.S. 130A-309.137

. A computer equipment manufacturer that sells 1,000 items of computer equipment or fewer per year is exempt from the requirement to pay the registration fee and the annual renewal fee imposed by this subsection.
The amount of the fee a computer equipment manufacturer shall pay shall be determined on the basis of the plan the manufacturer develops, submits, and implements pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, as follows:

A computer equipment manufacturer who develops, submits, and implements a Level I recycling plan pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section shall pay an initial registration fee of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) and an annual renewal
fee of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) to the Department.

A computer equipment manufacturer who develops, submits, and implements a Level II recycling plan pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section shall pay an initial registration fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and an annual renewal
fee of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) to the Department.

A computer equipment manufacturer who develops, submits, and implements a Level III recycling plan pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of this section shall pay an initial registration fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and an annual renewal
fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) to the Department.

Computer Equipment Recycling Plan Revision. — A computer equipment manufacturer may prepare a revised plan and submit it to the Department at any time as the manufacturer considers appropriate in response to changed circumstances or needs. The Department
may require a manufacturer to revise or update a plan if the Department finds that the plan is inadequate or out of date.

Payment of Costs for Plan Implementation. — Each computer equipment manufacturer is responsible for all costs associated with the development and implementation of its plan. A computer equipment manufacturer shall not collect a fee from a consumer or
a local government for the management of discarded computer equipment at the time the equipment is delivered for recycling.

Joint Computer Equipment Recycling Plans. — A computer equipment manufacturer may fulfill the requirements of subsection (c) of this section by participation in a joint recycling plan with other manufacturers. A joint plan shall meet the requirements
of subsection (c) of this section.

Annual Report. — Each computer equipment manufacturer shall submit a report to the Department by October 1 of each year stating the total weight of all computer equipment collected for recycling or reuse in the previous fiscal year. The report shall
also include a summary of actions taken to comply with the requirements of subsection (c) of this section.

History.
2010-67, s. 2(a).

§ 130A-309.135.
Requirements for television manufacturers.

Registration and Fee Required. — Each television manufacturer, before selling or offering for sale televisions in the State, shall register with the Department and, at the time of registration, shall pay an initial registration fee of two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500) to the Department. An initial registration shall be valid from the day of registration through the last day of the fiscal year in which the registration fee was paid. A television manufacturer that has
registered shall pay an annual renewal registration fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) to the Department. The annual renewal registration fee shall be paid to the Department each fiscal year no later than June 30
of the previous fiscal year. The proceeds of these fees shall be credited to the Electronics Management Fund. A television manufacturer that sells 1,000 televisions or fewer per year is exempt from the requirement to pay the registration
fee and the annual renewal fee imposed by this subsection.

Manufacturer Label Required. — A television manufacturer shall not sell or offer to sell any television in this State unless a visible, permanent label clearly identifying the manufacturer of that device is affixed to the equipment.

Recycling of Market Share Required. — The obligation to recycle televisions shall be allocated to each television manufacturer based on the television manufacturer’s market share. A television manufacturer must annually recycle or arrange for the recycling
of its market share of televisions pursuant to this section.

Due Diligence and Compliance Assessments. — A television manufacturer shall conduct and document due diligence assessments of the recyclers the manufacturer contracts with, including an assessment of compliance with environmentally sound recovery standards
adopted by the Department.

Contact Information Required. — A television manufacturer shall provide the Department with contact information for the manufacturer’s designated agent or employee whom the Department may contact for information related to the manufacturer’s compliance
with the requirements of this section.

Joint Television Recycling Plans. — A television manufacturer may fulfill the requirements of this section either individually or in participation with other television manufacturers.

Annual Report. — A television manufacturer shall report to the Department by October 1 of each year the total weight of televisions the manufacturer collected and recycled in the State during the previous fiscal year.

History.
2010-67, s. 2(a).

§ 130A-309.136.
Requirements applicable to retailers.

A manufacturer must not sell or offer for sale or deliver to retailers for subsequent sale new computer equipment or televisions unless: (i) the covered device is labeled with the manufacturer’s brand, which label is permanently affixed and readily visible;
and (ii) the manufacturer has filed a registration with the Department and is otherwise in compliance with the requirements of this Part, as indicated on the list developed and maintained by the Department pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.138(1).

A retailer that sells or offers for sale new computer equipment or televisions must: (i) determine that all new covered devices that the retailer is offering for sale are labeled with the manufacturer’s brand, which label is permanently affixed and readily
visible; and (ii) review the Department’s Web site to confirm that the manufacturer of a new covered device is on the list developed and maintained by the Department pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.138(1).

A retailer is not responsible for an unlawful sale under this section if the manufacturer’s registration expired or was revoked and the retailer took possession of the covered device prior to the expiration or revocation of the manufacturer’s registration
and the unlawful sale occurred within six months after the expiration or revocation.

History.
2010-67, s. 2(a).

§ 130A-309.137.
Electronics Management Fund.

Creation. — The Electronics Management Fund is created as a special fund within the Department. The Fund consists of revenue credited to the Fund from the proceeds of the fee imposed on computer equipment manufacturers under

G.S. 130A-309.134

and television manufacturers under

G.S. 130A-309.135

.

Use and Distribution. — Moneys in the Fund shall be used by the Department to implement the provisions of this Part concerning discarded computer equipment and televisions. The Department may use all of the proceeds of the fee imposed on television manufacturers
pursuant to

G.S. 130A-309.135

and may use up to ten percent (10%) of the proceeds of the fee imposed on computer equipment manufacturers under

G.S. 130A-309.134

for administration of the requirements of this Part. Funds remaining shall be distributed annually by the Department to eligible local governments pursuant to this section. The Department shall distribute such funds
on or before February 15 of each year. Funds shall be distributed on a pro rata basis.

Eligibility. — Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, no more than one unit of local government per county, including the county itself, may receive funding pursuant to this section for a program to manage discarded computer equipment,
televisions, and other electronic devices. A unit of local government shall submit a plan to include:

Information on existing programs within the jurisdiction to recycle or reuse discarded computer equipment, televisions, and other electronic devices, or information on a plan to begin such a program on a date certain. This information shall include a
description of the implemented or planned practices for collection of the equipment and a description of the types of equipment to be collected and how the equipment will be marketed for recycling.

Information on a public awareness and education program concerning the recycling and reuse of discarded computer equipment, televisions, and other electronic devices.

Information on methods to track and report total tonnage of computer equipment, televisions, and other electronic devices collected and recycled in the jurisdiction.

Information on interactions with other units of local government to provide or receive services concerning disposal of discarded computer equipment, televisions, and other electronic devices.

Information on how the unit of local government will account for the expenditure of funds received pursuant to this section.

Proof of contract or agreement with a recycler that is certified as adhering to Responsible Recycling (“R2”) practices or that is certified as an e-Steward recycler adhering to the e-Stewards Standard for Responsible Recycling and Reuse of Electronic
Equipment® to process the discarded computer equipment, televisions, and other electronic devices that the unit of local government collects.

(c1)

Submittal of Information for Distribution of Funding. —
Documentation meeting the requirements of subdivision (6) of subsection (c) of this section, and other information required by subsection (c) of this section, including new plans or revisions to plans
as necessary, must be submitted annually on or before December 31 in order to be eligible for funding during the next distribution by the Department.

Local Government Designation. — If more than one unit of local government in a county, including the county itself, requests funding pursuant to this section, the units of local government in question may enter into interlocal agreements for provision
of services concerning disposal of discarded computer equipment and televisions, and distribution of funds received pursuant to this section among the parties to the agreement. If the units of local government do not enter into
an interlocal agreement regarding funding under this section, the Department shall distribute funds to the eligible local governments based on the percentage of the county’s population to be served under each eligible local government’s
program.

Report. — Information regarding permanent recycling programs for discarded computer equipment and televisions for which funds are received pursuant to this section, and information on operative interlocal agreements executed in conjunction with funds
received, if any, shall be included in the annual report required under

G.S. 130A-309.09

A.

History.
2010-67, s. 2(a); 2013-409, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-409, s. 7, effective August 23, 2013, rewrote subsection (c); added subsection (c1); and rewrote subsection (d).

§ 130A-309.138.
Responsibilities of the Department.

In addition to its other responsibilities under this Part, the Department shall:

Develop and maintain a current list of manufacturers that are in compliance with the requirements of

G.S. 130A-309.134

and

G.S. 130A-309.135

, post the list to the Department’s Web site, and provide the current list to the Department of Information Technology each time that the list is updated.

Develop and implement a public education program on the laws governing the recycling and reuse of discarded computer equipment and televisions under this Part and on the methods available to consumers to comply with those requirements. The Department
shall make this information available on the Internet and shall provide technical assistance to manufacturers to meet the requirements of G.S. 130A-309.134(c)(1)e. The Department shall also provide technical assistance to units
of local government on the establishment and operation of discarded computer equipment and television collection centers and in the development and implementation of local public education programs.

Maintain the confidentiality of any information that is required to be submitted by a manufacturer under this Part that is designated as a trade secret, as defined in G.S. 66-152(3) and that is designated as confidential or as a trade secret under

G.S. 132-1.2

.

The Department shall use national televisions sales data available from commercially available analytical sources to calculate the generation of discarded televisions and to determine each television manufacturer’s recovery responsibilities for televisions
based on the manufacturer’s market share. The Department shall extrapolate data for the State from national data on the basis of the State’s share of the national population.

History.
2010-67, s. 2(a); 2015-241, s. 7A.4(l).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 7A.4( l ), effective September 18, 2015, substituted “Department of Information Technology” for “Office of Information Technology Services” near the end of subdivision (1).

§ 130A-309.139.
Enforcement.

This Part may be enforced as provided by Part 2 of Article 1 of this Chapter.

History.
2010-67, s. 2(a).

§ 130A-309.140.
Annual report by Department of recycling under this Part; periodic report by Environmental Review Commission of electronic recycling programs in other states.

The Department shall include in the status of solid waste management report required to be submitted pursuant to G.S. 130A-309.06(c) a report on the recycling of discarded computer equipment and televisions in the State under this Part. The report must
include an evaluation of the recycling rates in the State for discarded computer equipment and televisions, a discussion of compliance and enforcement related to the requirements of this Part, and any recommendations for any changes
to the system of collection and recycling of discarded computer equipment, televisions, or other electronic devices.

The Environmental Review Commission, with the assistance of the Department of Environmental Quality, shall monitor and review electronic recycling programs in other states on an ongoing basis and shall report its findings and recommendations to the General
Assembly periodically.

History.
2010-67, ss. 2(a), 7; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2017-10, s. 4.14(b); 2020-74, s. 11(f); 2020-78, s. 7.2(f).

§ 130A-309.141.
Local government authority not preempted.

Nothing in this Part shall be construed as limiting the authority of any local government to manage computer equipment and televisions that are solid waste.

History.
2010-67, s. 2(a).

§ 130A-309.142.
Registration of facilities recovering or recycling electronics required.

Facilities that recover or recycle covered devices or other electronic devices diverted from the waste stream for transfer, treatment, or processing shall register annually with the Department on or before August 1 of each year upon such form as the Department
may prescribe.

History.
2015-1, s. 2(e).

§§ 130A-309.143 through 130A-309.199.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2I. Coal Ash Management.

Subpart 1. Short Title, Definitions, and General Provisions.

§ 130A-309.200.
Title.

This Part may be cited as the “Coal Ash Management Act of 2014.”

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a).

§ 130A-309.201.
Definitions.

Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the definitions of

G.S. 130A-290

and the following definitions apply throughout this Part:

“Beneficial and beneficial use” means projects promoting public health and environmental protection, offering equivalent success relative to other alternatives, and preserving natural resources.

“Boiler slag” means the molten bottom ash collected at the base of slag tap and cyclone type furnaces that is quenched with water. It is made up of hard, black, angular particles that have a smooth, glassy appearance.

“Bottom ash” means the agglomerated, angular ash particles formed in pulverized coal furnaces that are too large to be carried in the flue gases and collect on the furnace walls or fall through open grates to an ash hopper at the bottom of the furnace.

“Coal combustion products” it means fly ash, bottom ash, boiler slag, or flue gas desulfurization materials that are beneficially used, including use for structural fill.

“Coal combustion residuals” has the same meaning as defined in

G.S. 130A-290

.

“Coal combustion residuals surface impoundment” means a topographic depression, excavation, or diked area that is (i) primarily formed from earthen materials; (ii) without a base liner approved for use by Article 9 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes
or rules adopted thereunder for a combustion products landfill or coal combustion residuals landfill, industrial landfill, or municipal solid waste landfill; and (iii) designed to hold accumulated coal combustion residuals in the
form of liquid wastes, wastes containing free liquids, or sludges, and that is not backfilled or otherwise covered during periods of deposition. “Coal combustion residuals surface impoundment” shall only include impoundments owned
by a public utility, as defined in

G.S. 62-3

. “Coal combustion residuals surface impoundment” includes all of the following:

An impoundment that is dry due to the deposited liquid having evaporated, volatilized, or leached.

An impoundment that is wet with exposed liquid.

Lagoons, ponds, aeration pits, settling ponds, tailings ponds, and sludge pits, when these structures are designed to hold accumulated coal combustion residuals.

A coal combustion residuals surface impoundment that has been covered with soil or other material after the final deposition of coal combustion residuals at the impoundment.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-95, s. 1, effective July 14, 2016.

“Flue gas desulfurization material” means the material produced through a process used to reduce sulfur dioxide emissions from the exhaust gas system of a coal-fired boiler. The physical nature of these materials varies from a wet sludge to a dry powdered
material, depending on the process, and their composition comprises either sulfites, sulfates, or a mixture thereof.

“Fly ash” means the very fine, powdery material, composed mostly of silica with nearly all particles spherical in shape, which is a product of burning finely ground coal in a boiler to produce electricity and is removed from the plant exhaust gases by
air emission control devices.

“Minerals” means soil, clay, coal, phosphate, metallic ore, and any other solid material or substance of commercial value found in natural deposits on or in the earth.

“Open pit mine” means an excavation made at the surface of the ground for the purpose of extracting minerals, inorganic and organic, from their natural deposits, which excavation is open to the surface.

“Owner” or “owner of a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment” means a public utility, as defined in

G.S. 62-3

, that owns a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment.

“Receptor” means any human, plant, animal, or structure which is, or has the potential to be, affected by the release or migration of contaminants. Any well constructed for the purpose of monitoring groundwater and contaminant concentrations shall not
be considered a receptor.

“Structural fill” means an engineered fill with a projected beneficial end use constructed using coal combustion products that are properly placed and compacted. For purposes of this Part, the term includes fill used to reclaim open pit mines and for
embankments, greenscapes, foundations, construction foundations, and for bases or sub-bases under a structure or a footprint of a paved road, parking lot, sidewalk, walkway, or similar structure.

“Use or reuse of coal combustion products” means the procedure whereby coal combustion products are directly used as either of the following:

As an ingredient in an industrial process to make a product, unless distinct components of the coal combustion products are recovered as separate end products.

In a function or application as an effective substitute for a commercial product or natural resource.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a); 2015-1, s. 3.1(a); 2016-95, s. 1.

§ 130A-309.202.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-95, s. 1, effective July 14, 2016.

History.
2014-122, s. 3(a); 2015-9, s. 1.1; repealed by 2016-95, s. 1, effective July 14, 2016.